Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2608
Witnesses, subpoenas, depositions.

(a) The arbitrators may issue or cause to be issued subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses, for the taking of depositions, and for the production of books, records, documents, and other evidence and shall have the power to administer oaths. Subpoenas so issued shall be served and, upon application to the court by a party or the arbitrators, enforced in the manner provided by law for the service and enforcement of subpoenas in a civil action.

(b) On application of a party and for use as evidence, the arbitrators may permit a deposition to be taken, in the manner and upon the terms designated by the arbitrators, of a witness who cannot be subpoenaed or is unable to attend the hearing.

(c) All provisions of law compelling a person under subpoena to testify are applicable.

(d) Fees for attendance as a witness shall be the same as for a witness in the county court.

Laws 1987, LB 71, § 8.